lexc/adj/enhuadjmnossz.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid

+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oeoez11§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez12e§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§OEOE1oe§ §OEOEoe§ §oeoez211§
§OEOE4a§ §oeoeadjoe§ §JPJ§ 
§oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§ §oeoezoe§ §oeoez2oe§

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry
                        Prefnum; ! empty string entry
                        Prefigekoto; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:észre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:előre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:felül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:külön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:utána   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végig   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:össze   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:által   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alul   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:haza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:abba   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:neki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:bele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:benn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szét   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tova   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:meg   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:oda   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:elő   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:túl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:föl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ide   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:le   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:el   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:át   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:be   Adj3igek;
            Adj3igek;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmincad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:trillió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billiárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj2num; ! empty string entry

LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam111;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam111;
LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Gen;
                            Gen111;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam111
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen111;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen111
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case111;
  

LEXICON Adj3igek
alázatlan AddAdj;
borulhatatlan AddAdj;
bélyegzetlen AddAdj;
dudvásodott AddAdj;
ejtetlen AddAdj;
engesztelhetetlen AddAdj;
fegyverzetlen AddAdj;
fellebezhetetlen AddAdj;
fonatlan AddAdj;
frissületlen AddAdj;
homályosítatlan AddAdj;
híreszteletlen AddAdj;
iránosodott AddAdj;
kalapálatlan AddAdj;
kovásodott  AddAdj;
lakatolatlan AddAdj;
metéletlen AddAdj;
nyeletlen AddAdj;
nyúzatlan AddAdj;
pusztítatlan AddAdj;
reteszeletlen AddAdj;
rostálatlan AddAdj;
rugódhatatlan AddAdj;
siratlan AddAdj;
vitatlan AddAdj;
vésetlen AddAdj;
éghetetlen AddAdj;
ürítetlen AddAdj;
LEXICON Adj
abroncsozatlan AddAdj;
acélszilárd AddAdj;
agymosott AddAdj;
allogén AddAdj;
anizotróp AddAdj;
antiangol AddAdj;
antimagyar AddAdj;
antionkogén AddAdj;
antiparallel AddAdj;
aszalatlan AddAdj;
audifon AddAdj;
autoantigén AddAdj;
autoreflexív AddAdj;
azonegy AddAdj;
balfelé AddAdj;
biztonságengedélyezett AddAdj;
blasztogén AddAdj;
bolsevikbarát AddAdj;
bálványosított AddAdj;
bérbevett AddAdj;
bíborbanszületett AddAdj;
centrál AddAdj;
cikkádor AddAdj;
cionbarát AddAdj;
csatornaosztott AddAdj;
csillogássóvár AddAdj;
csorbátlan AddAdj;
csíkozatlan AddAdj;
csünt AddAdj;
csődbement AddAdj;
céljavesztett AddAdj;
darázscsípett AddAdj;
derékbaszabott AddAdj;
doszt AddAdj;
drótmerev AddAdj;
dákóromán AddAdj;
együttélhetetlen AddAdj;
elektrogén AddAdj;
elmájasodott AddAdj;
elvszerűtlen AddAdj;
előlegzett AddAdj;
erőszakolatlan AddAdj;
etruszkbarát AddAdj;
excesszív AddAdj;
extrafinom AddAdj;
ezüstözetlen AddAdj;
fedeletlen AddAdj;
fehérhun AddAdj;
feljogosítatlan AddAdj;
fellogén AddAdj;
fenyőborított AddAdj;
fiavesztett AddAdj;
filtrálatlan AddAdj;
flóderezett AddAdj;
formakész AddAdj;
forrásirányított AddAdj;
furnírozott AddAdj;
félfett AddAdj;
fényáthatlan AddAdj;
fényérzéketlen AddAdj;
földbevájt AddAdj;
föléhúzott AddAdj;
geofón AddAdj;
germanomán AddAdj;
gombolyítatlan AddAdj;
gutgesinnt AddAdj;
gyógy AddAdj;
hajszálvonal AddAdj;
halványrózsaszín AddAdj;
halálsújtott AddAdj;
hegyikék AddAdj;
hengerded AddAdj;
hengernyomott AddAdj;
heteroduplex AddAdj;
hiper AddAdj;
hitvesztett AddAdj;
hominid AddAdj;
homogám AddAdj;
hungarorum AddAdj;
házhozszállított AddAdj;
hóborított AddAdj;
húrozatlan AddAdj;
hőnfutott AddAdj;
hőáthatlan AddAdj;
idézőjelezett AddAdj;
igénybevett AddAdj;
immunizálatlan AddAdj;
immunsuppressiv AddAdj;
inatlan AddAdj;
ineffektív AddAdj;
ingetlen AddAdj;
intrakután AddAdj;
invesztálatlan AddAdj;
iszapolatlan AddAdj;
jelszóvédett AddAdj;
joggyakorlott AddAdj;
jólirányzott AddAdj;
jólszervezett AddAdj;
kallózatlan AddAdj;
karimálatlan AddAdj;
kegyelemfosztott AddAdj;
keresztbefektetett AddAdj;
keresztrétegezett AddAdj;
kezetlen AddAdj;
kiállításidegen AddAdj;
koloratúr AddAdj;
korlátoztatlan AddAdj;
kovácsolatlan AddAdj;
kultúr AddAdj;
kárbaveszett AddAdj;
kócipor AddAdj;
ködbeveszett AddAdj;
könnyűded AddAdj;
környezetidegen AddAdj;
körülnyíratlan AddAdj;
közeltartott AddAdj;
közhírhedt AddAdj;
kőbeágyazott AddAdj;
kőzetkeletkezéstan AddAdj;
laktogén AddAdj;
licencbevett AddAdj;
lingár AddAdj;
lombár AddAdj;
légbőlkapott AddAdj;
lélegzetvisszafojtott AddAdj;
lényegidegen AddAdj;
líd AddAdj;
magateremtett AddAdj;
magárahagyott AddAdj;
malátázatlan AddAdj;
maszkprogramozott AddAdj;
megyeidegen AddAdj;
memórialeképezett AddAdj;
metabolizál AddAdj;
mezetlen AddAdj;
mitogén AddAdj;
modulfordított AddAdj;
monochrom AddAdj;
munkátalan AddAdj;
márványzott AddAdj;
médiumidegen AddAdj;
műfajidegen AddAdj;
naplózatlan AddAdj;
nemstandard AddAdj;
neonrózsaszín AddAdj;
nyájidegen AddAdj;
oktatásidegen AddAdj;
osztyák AddAdj;
partnerköz AddAdj;
pesticid AddAdj;
piacidegen AddAdj;
plisszírozott AddAdj;
pontszaggatott AddAdj;
posírozott AddAdj;
prospektív AddAdj;
pszichogén AddAdj;
pártfogolatlan AddAdj;
pókhálószál AddAdj;
rangrejtett AddAdj;
reményevesztett AddAdj;
reábízott AddAdj;
rohamérett AddAdj;
rájatett AddAdj;
rátokkényszerített AddAdj;
rétegzetlen AddAdj;
rüpők AddAdj;
sebesítetlen AddAdj;
soktízezer AddAdj;
struktúraidegen AddAdj;
subcután AddAdj;
szaldírozatlan AddAdj;
szemléletidegen AddAdj;
szervezetidegen AddAdj;
szolgáltatásidegen AddAdj;
szubminiatűr AddAdj;
száratlan AddAdj;
színházidegen AddAdj;
színtörök AddAdj;
szövegidegen AddAdj;
szürkésdrapp AddAdj;
sötétcián AddAdj;
tartósítatlan AddAdj;
temperálatlan AddAdj;
terrigén AddAdj;
toronyidegen AddAdj;
tudományidegen AddAdj;
tántoríthatalan AddAdj;
társulásidegen AddAdj;
típusidegen AddAdj;
törmelékborított AddAdj;
tőrülmetszett AddAdj;
utóhadjárat AddAdj;
vakvéletlen AddAdj;
vicikvacak AddAdj;
vágyteremtett AddAdj;
városidegen AddAdj;
vígasztalan AddAdj;
vöröseskék AddAdj;
zimogén AddAdj;
ágatlan AddAdj;
ál AddAdj;
áramszabályozott AddAdj;
éhenhalasztott AddAdj;
érdemetlen AddAdj;
ítéletképtelen AddAdj;
öntetlen AddAdj;
övetlen AddAdj;
újrameggyújtott AddAdj;
ősprimitív AddAdj;
